Washington statutes.
RCW 1.20.180

State oyster.

The Ostrea lurida is hereby designated the official oyster of the state of Washington. This native oyster species plays an important role in the history and culture that surrounds shellfish in Washington state and along the west coast of the United States. Some of the common and historic names used for this species are Native, Western, Shoalwater, and Olympia.

[ 2014 c 146 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—2014 c 146: "The Ostrea lurida is the only oyster native to Washington state." [ 2014 c 146 s 1.]